Utah statutes.
62A-11-306.1.   Issuance or modification of an order to collect support for persons not receiving public assistance.

The office may proceed to issue or modify an order under Section 62A-11-304.2 and collect under this part even though public assistance is not being provided on behalf of a dependent child if the office provides support collection services in accordance with:

(1)  an application for services provided under Title IV-D of the federal Social Security Act;

(2)  the continued service provisions of Subsection 62A-11-307.2(5); or

(3)  the interstate provisions of Section 62A-11-305.



Amended by Chapter 232, 1997 General Session

